finite_state_project/LA_creole_french_english.lexc
LEXICON VEngInf
! Present
+Pres+1p+Sg:0                   #               ;
+Pres+2p+Sg:0                   #               ;
+Pres+3p+Sg:0                   #               ;
+Pres+1p+Pl:0                   #               ;
+Pres+2p+Pl:0                   #               ;
+Pres+3p+Pl:0                   #               ;
! Past
+PastPar:0                      #               ;
